Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.880

Apprentices—Recommendations of the state board for community and technical colleges.

The state board for community and technical colleges shall provide recommendations to the apprenticeship council and apprenticeship programs, established under chapter 49.04 RCW, on matters of related and supplemental instruction for apprentices, coordination of instruction with job experiences, and the qualification of teachers for such instruction.

[ 2001 c 204 s 8; 1991 c 238 s 111.]